Hawaii statutes.
[§5-6.5] State language. The Hawaiian
language is the native language of Hawaii and may be used on all emblems and
symbols representative of the State, its departments, agencies and political
subdivisions. [L 1978, c 207, §1]

Law Journals and Reviews

"Officially" What? The Legal Rights and
Implications of ‘Ōlelo Hawai‘i. 30 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next